Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.040

Annual license fee.

The application for an annual license to engage in the business of operating a controlled atmosphere storage warehouse or warehouses shall be accompanied by an annual license fee prescribed by the director by rule.

[ 1988 c 254 s 6; 1961 c 29 s 4.]